Wisconsin, session 2025, AB941.
do enact as follows:AB941,11Section 1. 5.02 (6m) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB941,2,1025.02 (6m) (f) An unexpired identification card issued by a university or college 3in this state that is accredited, as defined in s. 39.30 (1) (d), or by a technical college 4in this state that is a member of and governed by the technical college system under 5ch. 38, that contains the date of issuance and signature of the individual to whom it 6is issued and that contains an expiration date indicating that the card expires no 7later than 2 years after the date of issuance if the individual establishes, except 8that, if the identification card is expired, the individual shall establish that he or 9she is enrolled as a student at the university or college on the date that the card is 10presented.AB941,211Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB941,2,1512(1) No later than August 1, 2026, each University of Wisconsin System 13institution and each technical college in this state that is a member of and governed 14by the technical college system under ch. 38 shall issue student identification cards 15that qualify as identification under s. 5.02 (6m) (f).AB941,2,1616